Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5423
Utilization review agent; notify director of changes; when.

A utilization review agent shall notify the director within five working days of any change of the agent's approval or accreditation status or of any material change in the information contained in the agent's application or renewal or that the agent no longer meets the requirements of the Utilization Review Act.

Laws 1992, LB 428, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 44-5413;

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 8.